Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-138
Partnership or limited liability company;
disciplinary action; grounds.

After notice and hearing as
provided in sections 1-140 to 1-149, the board shall revoke the registration
and permit or the practice
privilege of a partnership or a limited liability company of certified
public accountants if at any
time it does not have all the qualifications prescribed by section 1-126 or sections 1-125.01 and 1-125.02, under
which it qualified for registration or
for the practice privilege or temporary practice privilege, respectively.

After notice and hearing as provided in sections 1-140 to 1-149, the
board may take disciplinary action as provided in section 1-148 for any of
the causes enumerated in section 1-137 or for any of the following additional
causes:

(1) The revocation or suspension of the certificate or registration
or the revocation or suspension or refusal to renew the permit of any partner
or member; or

(2) The cancellation, revocation, suspension, or refusal to renew the
authority of the partnership or any partner thereof or the limited liability
company or any member thereof to practice public accountancy in any other
state for any cause other than failure to pay a registration fee in such other
state.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 33, p. 67;

Laws 1993, LB 41, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 50;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 32;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 22.